Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.150.010

Public schools.

Public schools means the common schools as referred to in Article IX of the state Constitution, charter schools established under chapter 28A.710 RCW, and those schools and institutions of learning having a curriculum below the college or university level as now or may be established by law and maintained at public expense.

[ 2016 c 241 s 131. Prior: 2013 c 2 s 301 (Initiative Measure No. 1240, approved November 6, 2012); 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.01.055; (2004 c 22 s 24, Referendum Measure No. 55 failed to become law). Formerly RCW 28A.01.055.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2016 c 241: See RCW 28A.710.901.